Nevada, session 83, SB60-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.25. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.35. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.43. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.47. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.55. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.65. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.75. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7.6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB60_R3*

– 3 –
Sec. 9.2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9.6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9.8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17.3 (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17.7 (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. Chapter 294A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 22 to 25, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 22. “Constitutional office” or “constitutional officer”
means:
1. The Governor;
2. The Lieutenant Governor;
3. The Secretary of State;
4. The State Treasurer;
5. The State Controller; and
6. The Attorney General.
Sec. 23. “Inaugural committee” means any organization,
person or group of persons that anticipates receiving contributions
or making expenditures for the inauguration of a constitutional
officer.
Sec. 24. 1. An inaugural committee shall report for each
period required pursuant to subsection 2:
(a) Each contribution received relating to the inauguration in
excess of $1,000;
(b) Contributions received during the period relating to the
inauguration from a contributor which cumulatively exceed
$1,000;
-
*SB60_R3*

– 4 –
(c) The total number of all contributions received during the
period relating to the inauguration which are not otherwise
required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (b);
(d) Each expenditure relating to the inauguration made during
the period in excess of $1,000; and
(e) Expenditures made relating to the inauguration during the
period to one recipient which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must be filed:
(a) Not later than the date that is the 90th day following the
first day of the regular session of the Legislature that is
immediately following the inauguration of the constitutional
officer, for the period beginning on the date of the organization of
the committee and ending on the 75th day of such regular session;
(b) Not later than 15 days after the end of such regular
session, for the period of the following year, for the period
beginning on the 76th day of such regular session and ending on
the last day of such regular session; and
(c) Not later than January 15, for the period beginning on
January 1 of any year other than the year immediately following
the year of the general election and ending on December 31 of the
previous year.
3. An inaugural committee that disbands shall:
(a) Notify the Secretary of State; and
(b) File a final report that sets forth:
(1) Each contribution and expenditure required to be
reported pursuant to subsection 1 that has not previously been
reported; and
(2) The disposition of any contributions made to the
inaugural committee that are not spent or committed for
expenditure by the inaugural committee.
 Nothing in this subsection requires an inaugural committee to
report information that has previously been reported in a timely
manner pursuant to this section.
4. An inaugural committee is not subject to the provisions of
NRS 294A.100 or 294A.300.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 294A.3737, the
reports required by this section must be filed electronically with
the Secretary of State.
6. A report filed pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be
filed on the date that it was received by the Secretary of State.
Every inaugural committee shall file a report as required by this
section even if the committee receives no contributions.
Sec. 25. 1. A candidate for a constitutional office who is
elected shall report, not later than the 90th day following the first
day of the regular session of the Legislature that is immediately
-
*SB60_R3*

– 5 –
following the inauguration of the constitutional officer, for the
period beginning on the day following the general election and
ending on the day immediately preceding the beginning of the
period set forth in NRS 294A.300:
(a) Each contribution in excess of $100 received in relation to
the transition to holding the office constitutional during the
period;
(b) Contributions received in relation to the transition to
holding the constitutional office during the period from a
contributor which cumulatively exceed $100;
(c) The total of all contributions received in relation to the
transition to holding the constitutional office during the period
which are $100 or less and which are not otherwise required to be
reported pursuant to paragraph (b);
(d) The balance in the account maintained by the candidate
pursuant to NRS 294A.130 on the ending date of the period; and
(e) Goods and services provided in kind in relation to the
transition to holding the constitutional office and for which money
would have otherwise been paid.
2. Nothing in this section requires the candidate to report
information that has previously been reported in a timely manner
pursuant to this chapter.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 294A.3733, the
reports required by this section must be filed electronically with
the Secretary of State.
4. A report filed pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be
filed on the date that it was received by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 26. NRS 294A.002 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.002 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 294A.0025 to
294A.014, inclusive, and sections 22 and 23 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 27. NRS 294A.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.325 1. A foreign national shall not, directly or
indirectly, make a contribution or a commitment to make a
contribution to:
(a) A candidate;
(b) A committee for political action;
(c) A committee for the recall of a public officer;
(d) A person who makes an independent expenditure;
(e) A political party or committee sponsored by a political party
that makes an expenditure for or against a candidate or group of
candidates;
-
*SB60_R3*

– 6 –
(f) An organization made up of legislative members of a
political party whose primary purpose is to provide support for their
political efforts;
(g) A personal campaign committee or the personal
representative of a candidate who receives contributions or makes
expenditures that are reported as contributions or expenditures by
the candidate; [or]
(h) A nonprofit corporation that is registered or required to be
registered pursuant to NRS 294A.225 [.] ; or
(i) An inaugural committee.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a candidate,
person, group, committee, political party, organization or nonprofit
corporation described in subsection 1 shall not knowingly solicit,
accept or receive a contribution or a commitment to make a
contribution from a foreign national.
3. For the purposes of subsection 2, if a candidate, person,
group, committee, political party, organization or nonprofit
corporation is aware of facts that would lead a reasonable person to
inquire whether the source of a contribution is a foreign national, the
candidate, person, group, committee, political party, organization or
nonprofit corporation shall be deemed to have not knowingly
solicited, accepted or received a contribution in violation of
subsection 2 if the candidate, person, group, committee, political
party, organization or nonprofit corporation requests and obtains
from the source of the contribution a copy of current and valid
United States passport papers. This subsection does not apply to any
candidate, person, group, committee, political party, organization or
nonprofit corporation if the candidate, person, group, committee,
political party, organization or nonprofit corporation has actual
knowledge that the source of the contribution solicited, accepted or
received is a foreign national.
4. If a candidate, person, group, committee, political party,
organization or nonprofit corporation discovers that the candidate,
person, group, committee, political party, organization or nonprofit
corporation received a contribution in violation of this section, the
candidate, person, group, committee, political party, organization or
nonprofit corporation shall, if at the time of discovery of the
violation:
(a) Sufficient money received as contributions is available,
return the contribution received in violation of this section not later
than 30 days after such discovery.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), sufficient
money received as contributions is not available, return the
contribution received in violation of this section as contributions
become available for this purpose.
-
*SB60_R3*

– 7 –
(c) Sufficient money received as contributions is not available
and contributions are no longer being solicited or accepted, not be
required to return any amount of the contribution received in
violation of this section that exceeds the amount of contributions
available for this purpose.
5. A violation of any provision of this section is a gross
misdemeanor.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Foreign national” has the meaning ascribed to it in [2
U.S.C. § 441e.] 52 U.S.C. § 30121.
(b) “Knowingly” means that a candidate, person, group,
committee, political party, organization or nonprofit corporation:
(1) Has actual knowledge that the source of the contribution
solicited, accepted or received is a foreign national;
(2) Is aware of facts which would lead a reasonable person to
conclude that there is a substantial probability that the source of the
contribution solicited, accepted or received is a foreign national; or
(3) Is aware of facts which would lead a reasonable person to
inquire whether the source of the contribution solicited, accepted or
received is a foreign national, but failed to conduct a reasonable
inquiry.
Sec. 28. NRS 294A.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.350 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
every candidate for office shall file the reports required by NRS
294A.120, 294A.125, 294A.128, 294A.200, 294A.286 and
294A.362, and section 25 of this act, even though the candidate:
(a) Withdraws his or her candidacy pursuant to NRS 293.202 or
293C.195;
(b) Ends his or her campaign without withdrawing his or her
candidacy pursuant to NRS 293.202 or 293C.195;
(c) Receives no contributions;
(d) Has no campaign expenses;
(e) Is not opposed in the election by another candidate;
(f) Is defeated in the primary election;
(g) Is removed from the ballot by court order; or
(h) Is the subject of a petition to recall and the special election is
not held.
2. A candidate described in paragraph (a), (b), (f) or (g) of
subsection 1 may simultaneously file all the reports required by
NRS 294A.120, 294A.125, 294A.128, 294A.200, 294A.286 and
294A.362 and section 25 of this act that are due after the candidate
disposes of any unspent or excess contributions as provided in NRS
294A.117 or subsections 4, 5 and 6 of NRS 294A.160, as
applicable, if the candidate gives written notice to the Secretary of
State, on the form prescribed by the Secretary of State, that the
-
*SB60_R3*

– 8 –
candidate is ending his or her campaign and will not accept any
additional contributions. If the candidate has submitted a withdrawal
of candidacy pursuant to NRS 293.202 or 293C.195 to an officer
other than the Secretary of State, the candidate must enclose with
the notice a copy of the withdrawal of candidacy. A form submitted
to the Secretary of State pursuant to this subsection must be signed
by the candidate under an oath to God or penalty of perjury. A
candidate who signs the form under an oath to God is subject to the
same penalties as if the candidate had signed the form under penalty
of perjury.
3. A candidate described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 who
simultaneously files reports pursuant to subsection 2 but is elected
to office despite ending his or her campaign is subject to the
reporting requirements set forth in NRS 294A.120, 294A.125,
294A.128, 294A.200, 294A.286 and 294A.362, and section 25 of
this act, beginning with the next report that is due pursuant to those
sections after his or her election to office.
Sec. 29. NRS 294A.362 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.362 1. In addition to reporting information pursuant to
NRS 294A.120, 294A.125, 294A.128 and 294A.200, and section 25
of this act, each candidate who is required to file a report pursuant
to NRS 294A.120, 294A.125, 294A.128 or 294A.200 and section
25 of this act shall report on the form designed and made available
by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 294A.373 goods and
services provided in kind for which money would otherwise have
been paid. The candidate shall list on the form:
(a) Each such contribution in excess of $100 received during the
reporting period;
(b) Each such contribution from a contributor received during
the reporting period which cumulatively exceeds $100;
(c) Each such campaign expense in excess of $100 incurred
during the reporting period;
(d) The total of all such contributions received during the
reporting period which are $100 or less and which are not otherwise
required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (b); and
(e) The total of all such campaign expenses incurred during the
reporting period which are $100 or less.
2. The Secretary of State shall not require a candidate to list the
contributions and campaign expenses described in this section on
any form other than the form designed and made available by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 294A.373.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 294A.3733, the report
required by subsection 1 must be filed in the same manner and at the
same time as the report filed pursuant to NRS 294A.120, 294A.125,
294A.128 or 294A.200 [.] or section 25 of this act.
-
*SB60_R3*

– 9 –
Sec. 30. NRS 294A.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.390 The officer from whom a candidate or entity
requests a form for:
1. A declaration of candidacy;
2. The registration of a nonprofit corporation pursuant to NRS
294A.225, a committee for political action pursuant to NRS
294A.230 or a committee for the recall of a public officer pursuant
to NRS 294A.250; or
3. The reporting of the creation of a legal defense fund
pursuant to NRS 294A.286,
 shall furnish the candidate or entity with the necessary forms for
reporting and copies of the regulations adopted by the Secretary of
State pursuant to this chapter. An explanation of the applicable
provisions of NRS 294A.100, 294A.120, 294A.128, 294A.140,
294A.150, 294A.200, 294A.210, 294A.220, 294A.270 or 294A.280
or section 24 and 25 of this act relating to the making, accepting or
reporting of contributions, campaign expenses or expenditures and
the penalties for a violation of those provisions as set forth in NRS
294A.100 or 294A.420, and an explanation of NRS 294A.286 and
294A.287 relating to the accepting or reporting of contributions
received by and expenditures made from a legal defense fund and
the penalties for a violation of those provisions as set forth in NRS
294A.287 and 294A.420, must be developed by the Secretary of
State and provided upon request. The candidate or entity shall
acknowledge receipt of the material.
Sec. 31. NRS 294A.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.420 1. If the Secretary of State receives information
that a candidate, person, organization, committee, political party or
nonprofit corporation that is subject to the provisions of NRS
294A.120, 294A.128, 294A.140, 294A.150, 294A.200, 294A.210,
294A.220, 294A.230, 294A.250, 294A.270, 294A.280 or 294A.286
or section 24 and 25 of this act has not filed a report or form for
registration pursuant to the applicable provisions of those sections,
the Secretary of State may, after giving notice to that candidate,
person, organization, committee, political party or nonprofit
corporation, cause the appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the
First Judicial District Court.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a candidate,
person, organization, committee, political party or nonprofit
corporation that violates an applicable provision of this chapter is
subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation
and payment of court costs and attorney’s fees. The civil penalty
must be recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the State
of Nevada by the Secretary of State in the First Judicial District
-
*SB60_R3*

– 10 –
Court and deposited by the Secretary of State for credit to the State
General Fund in the bank designated by the State Treasurer.
3. If a civil penalty is imposed because a candidate, person,
organization, committee, political party or nonprofit corporation has
reported its contributions, campaign expenses, independent
expenditures or other expenditures after the date the report is due,
except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the amount of the
civil penalty is:
(a) If the report is not more than 7 days late, $25 for each day
the report is late.
(b) If the report is more than 7 days late but not more than 15
days late, $50 for each day the report is late.
(c) If the report is more than 15 days late, $100 for each day the
report is late.
 A civil penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection against a
public officer who by law is not entitled to receive compensation for
his or her office or a candidate for such an office must not exceed a
total of $100 if the public officer or candidate received no
contributions and made no expenditures during the relevant
reporting periods.
4. For good cause shown, the Secretary of State may waive a
civil penalty that would otherwise be imposed pursuant to this
section.
5. When considering whether to waive, pursuant to subsection
4, a civil penalty that would otherwise be imposed pursuant to
subsection 3, the Secretary of State may consider, without
limitation:
(a) The seriousness of the violation, including, without
limitation, the nature, circumstances and extent of the violation;
(b) Any history of violations committed by the candidate,
person, organization, committee, political party or nonprofit
corporation against whom the civil penalty would otherwise be
imposed;
(c) Any mitigating factor, including, without limitation, whether
the candidate, person, organization, committee, political party or
nonprofit corporation against whom the civil penalty would
otherwise be imposed reported the violation, corrected the violation
in a timely manner, attempted to correct the violation or cooperated
with the Secretary of State in resolving the situation that led to the
violation;
(d) Whether the violation was inadvertent;
(e) Any knowledge or experience the candidate, person,
organization, committee, political party or nonprofit corporation has
with the provisions of this chapter; and
-
*SB60_R3*

– 11 –
(f) Any other factor that the Secretary of State deems to be
relevant.
6. If the Secretary of State waives a civil penalty pursuant to
subsection 4, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) Create a record which sets forth that the civil penalty has
been waived and describes the circumstances that constitute the
good cause shown; and
(b) Ensure that the record created pursuant to paragraph (a) is
available for review by the general public.
7. The remedies and penalties provided by this chapter are
cumulative, do not abrogate and are in addition to any other
remedies and penalties that may exist at law or in equity, including,
without limitation, any criminal penalty that may be imposed
pursuant to this chapter or NRS 199.120, 199.145 or 239.330.
Sec. 32. 1. On or before October 1, 2023, any inaugural
committee that was formed in relation to a candidate for a
constitutional office, as defined in section 22 of this act, at the 2022
General Election shall, for the period beginning on the day that the
inaugural committee was formed and ending on the last day of
the 82nd Regular Session of the Nevada Legislature, report to the
Secretary of State:
(a) Each contribution received in relation to the inauguration in
excess of $1,000;
(b) Contributions received in relation to the inauguration during
the period from a contributor which cumulatively exceed $1,000;
(c) The total number of all contributions received in relation to
the inauguration during the period which are not otherwise required
to be reported pursuant to paragraph (b);
(d) Each expenditure made in relation to the inauguration during
the period in excess of $1,000; and
(e) Expenditures made during the period in relation to the
inauguration to one recipient which cumulatively exceed $1,000.
2. Nothing in this section requires an inaugural committee to
report information that has previously been reported in a timely
manner pursuant to the provisions of chapter 294A of NRS.
3. As used in this section, “inaugural committee” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 23 of this act.
Sec. 33. 1. On or before October 1, 2023, for the period
beginning on the day following the 2022 General Election and
ending on the day of the 2023 Inauguration, each constitutional
officer shall report to the Secretary of State:
(a) Each contribution in excess of $100 received in relation to
the transition to holding the constitutional office during the period;
-
*SB60_R3*

– 12 –
(b) Contributions received during the period in relation to the
transition to holding the constitutional office from a contributor
which cumulatively exceed $100;
(c) The total of all contributions received during the period in
relation to the transition to holding the constitutional office which
are $100 or less and which are not otherwise required to be reported
pursuant to paragraph (b); and
(d) Goods and services provided in kind in relation to the
transition to holding the constitutional office and for which money
would have otherwise been paid.
2. Nothing in this section requires a constitutional officer to
report information that has previously been reported in a timely
manner pursuant to chapter 294A of NRS.
3. As used in this section, “constitutional office” or
“constitutional officer” have the meaning ascribed to those terms in
section 22 of this act.
Sec. 34. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*SB60_R3*